Ohio, session 136, HB606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.706 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.706. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound lanes of state route number one hundred nine between county roads V and W, in Henry county, shall be known as the "Marjorie Whiteman Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.